incubator/apertium-olo-fin/apertium-olo-fin.olo.lexc
LEXICON Noun-NB-loi
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>loi Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>loi ILLSUF_he ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
 SGGENSUF ; ! The singular comitative is declined here
 PLNOMSUF ;
 

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>: K ;

LEXICON SGPARSUF_dU1
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>dU1 K ;


LEXICON SGPARSUF_A2
%<sg%>%<par%>:%>A2 K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%^WEAK%>n K ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%^WEAK%>n K ;
%<sg%>%<com%>:%^WEAK%>nke K ;

LEXICON PLNOMSUF
%<p%>%<nom%>:%^WEAK%>t K ;
%<p%>%<acc%>:%^WEAK%>t K ;

LEXICON PLGENSUF
%<p%>%<gen%>:%>n K ;
%<p%>%<com%>:%^WEAK%>nke K ;

LEXICON ILLSUF_he
%<ill%>:%>he K ;

LEXICON PLINSSUF
%<p%>%<ins%>:%>n K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_Zero
%<p%>%<par%>: K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_a
%<p%>%<par%>:%>A1 K ;

LEXICON PLPARSUF_i
%<p%>%<par%>:%>i K ;

LEXICON Noun-NB-01
%<ess%>:%^WEAK%>nnU1 K ;
%<tra%>:%^WEAK%>kse K ;
%<ine%>:%^WEAK%>s K ;
%<ela%>:%^WEAK%>s K ;
%<ela%>:%^WEAK%>späi K ;
%<ill%>:%>h K ;
%<ade%>:%^WEAK%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WEAK%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WEAK%>lpäi K ;
%<all%>:%^WEAK%>le K ;
%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>ttA1h K ;
%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>ttA1 K ;
%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>tA1 K ;
%<prl%>:%>či K ;
%<apr%>:%^WEAK%>llU1O1 K ;
%<ter%>:%^WEAK%>ssA1h K ;



!! Quantifier inflection
!! ---------------
!! Livvi quantifiers inflect for case.

LEXICON NUM_
%<tyä%>%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON Num-kolme !!= @CODE@ 
%<num%>%<card%>: # ;

LEXICON QNT_
%<tyä%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON ORD_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ toine:toi
%<qnt%>%<ord%>: NMN_KIELINE ;

LEXICON ORD_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
%<qnt%>%<ord%>: NMN_KARJALAINE ;
















!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! Verbs in the Livvi (Olonets) Karelian language inflect for mood, number and persons.


LEXICON V_
%<tyä%>%<v%>: K ;

LEXICON V-NEG
!ei:e
%<v%>%<neg%>%<scsg3%>:i # ;

LEXICON V_OLLA
!olla:o
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>:le%^WEAK%>n K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>:le%^WEAK%>t K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>:n K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl1%>:le%^WEAK%>mmO1 K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl2%>:le%^WEAK%>ttO1 K ;
%<v%>:l INDPRSPL3_dAh ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<conneg%>:le%^WEAK K ;

%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg1%>:l%^WEAK%>in K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg2%>:l%^WEAK%>it K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg3%>:l%>i K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl1%>:l%^WEAK%>immO1 K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl2%>:l%^WEAK%>ittO1 K ;
%<v%>:l INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>:l%>nU1%^WEAKh K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>%<scpl3%>:l%>tU1 K ;
%<v%>:l CONDPRS  ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 

LEXICON V_KANDUA
!Verbs of the Finnish type 1
!V1a
!kandua:kanda
%<v%>: V-VV_01 ;
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>A2 K ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 


LEXICON V_PUNUO
!V1o
!punuo:puno
%<v%>: V-VV_01 ;
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>A2 K ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 


LEXICON V_VALUO
!V1u
!valuo:valu
%<v%>: V-VV_01 ;
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>A2 K ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 



!V1i
LEXICON V_POTKIE
!potkie:potki
%<v%>: K ;
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>A2 K ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 


LEXICON  V_PIDIÄ
! pidiä:pidä
%<v%>: V-VV_01 ;
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>A2 K ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 



LEXICON V-VV_01
! V1
! This verb type has two final vowels in the first infinitive
 INDPRSSG1 ;
 INDPRSSG2 ;
 INDPRSSG3 ;
 INDPRSPL1 ;
 INDPRSPL2 ;
 INDPRSPL3_EtAh ;
 INDPRSCONNEG ;

 INDPRTSG1 ;
 INDPRTSG2 ;
 INDPRTSG3 ;
 INDPRTPL1 ;
 INDPRTPL2 ;
 INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>:%>nU1h K ;
 INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Ettu ;

LEXICON V_SUAJA
!Verbs of the Finnish type 2
! suaja:saa
%<v%>: INDPRSSG1 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSSG2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSSG3 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL1 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL3_jAh ;
%<v%>: INDPRSCONNEG ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG1     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG3     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL1     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprc%>%:%>nU1%^WEAKh K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprcpl3%>:%>dU1 K ;
%<v%>: CONDPRS ;
%<v%>:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
%<v%>:%>dU1%^WEAK CONDPRT ;
%<v%>:%>dA1 CONDPRTPL3 ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ta%>:%>jA2 K ;

LEXICON V_TULLA
!Verbs of the Finnish type 3
!tulla:tul
%<v%>:e INDPRSSG1 ;
%<v%>:e INDPRSSG2 ;
%<v%>:O1 INDPRSSG3 ;
%<v%>:e INDPRSPL1 ;
%<v%>:e INDPRSPL2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL3_dAh ;
!%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprc%>%:dA1%^WEAKh K ;
%<v%>:e INDPRSCONNEG ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG1     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTSG3     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL1     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprc%>%:%>nU1%^WEAKh K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprcpl3%>:%>dU1 K ;
%<v%>: CONDPRS ;
%<v%>:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
%<v%>:%>dU1%^WEAK CONDPRT ;
%<v%>:%>dA1 CONDPRTPL3 ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>mA2h K ; 


LEXICON V_TYPÄTÄ !!= @CODE@ typätä:typpä
%<v%>: #;

LEXICON V_AVATA !!= @CODE@ typätä:typpä
!Verbs of the Finnish type 4
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSSG1 ;
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSSG2 ;
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSSG3 ;
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSPL1 ;
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSPL2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL3_tAh ;
%<v%>:%>A2 INDPRSCONNEG ;
%<v%>:%^SyllBound INDPRTSG1     ;
%<v%>:%^SyllBound INDPRTSG2     ;
%<v%>:%^SyllBound INDPRTSG3     ;
%<v%>:%^SyllBound INDPRTPL1     ;
%<v%>:%^SyllBound INDPRTPL2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL3_ttih     ; 
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprc%>%:%^WEAK%>nnU1h K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprcpl3%>:%^WEAK%>ttU1 K ;
%<v%>: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh ; !!
%<v%>: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_ttu ;
%<v%>: CONDPRS ;
%<v%>:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
%<v%>:%>dU1%^WEAK CONDPRT ;
%<v%>:%>dA1 CONDPRTPL3 ;
%<v%>%<der_n%>:%>A2%>mi N_KIELINE ; 
%<v%>%<der_inf_ma%>%<ill%>:%>A2%>mA2h K ; 



LEXICON V_SUVAIJA
!Verbs of the Finnish type 5
! suvaija:suvai
%<v%>:čče INDPRSSG1 ;
%<v%>:čče INDPRSSG2 ;
%<v%>:ččO1 INDPRSSG3 ;
%<v%>:čče INDPRSPL1 ;
%<v%>:čče INDPRSPL2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL3_jAh ;
%<v%>:čče INDPRSCONNEG ;

LEXICON V_ALETA !!= @CODE@ aleta:ala (alanov)
!! aleta:ale
%<v%>:ne INDPRSSG1 ;
%<v%>:ne INDPRSSG2 ;
%<v%>:nO1 INDPRSSG3 ;
%<v%>:ne INDPRSPL1 ;
%<v%>:ne INDPRSPL2 ;
%<v%>: INDPRSPL3_tAh ;
%<v%>:ne INDPRSCONNEG ;
%<v%>:n INDPRTSG1     ;
%<v%>:n INDPRTSG2     ;
%<v%>:n INDPRTSG3     ;
%<v%>:n INDPRTPL1     ;
%<v%>:n INDPRTPL2     ;
%<v%>: INDPRTPL3_ttih     ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprc%>%:%>nnU1h K ;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prfprcpl3%>:%>ttU1 K ;
%<v%>: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh ; !!
%<v%>: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_ttu ;
%<v%>:n CONDPRS ;
!%<v%>:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
!%<v%>:%>dU1%^WEAK CONDPRT ;
!%<v%>:%>dA1 CONDPRTPL3 ;

LEXICON V_SUATA !!= @CODE@ suata:suva (suvaiččov)
%<v%>: #;

LEXICON VR_AMBUO
! ambuokseh:ambu
	VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_KANDUA
! kanduakseh:kanda
  VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_RODIEKSEH
! Reflexive verbs
!rodiekseh:rodi
 VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_AVATA !!= @CODE@ typätä:typpä
! avatakseh:ava
 VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcsg1%>:%^WEAK%>mmO1s	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcsg2%>:%^WEAK%>ttO1s	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcsg3%>:%^WEAK%>h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl1%>:%^WEAK%>mmO1kseh	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl2%>:%^WEAK%>ttO1kseh	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl3%>:%^WEAK%>jA1h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcsg%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK%>	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl1%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK%>	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl2%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK%>	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<rcpl3%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK%>jA1	K	;

%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcsg1%>:%>mmO1s	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcsg2%>:%>ttO1s	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcsg3%>:%>h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl1%>:%>mmO1kseh	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl2%>:%>ttO1kseh	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl3%>:%>ttih	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcsg%>%<conneg%>:%>nU1h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl1%>%<conneg%>:%>nU1h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl2%>%<conneg%>:%>nU1h	K	;
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<rcpl3%>%<conneg%>:%>ttU1	K	;




!! Nonfinites

!! Finites
!! Indicative
LEXICON INDPRSSG1
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>:%^WEAK%>n K ;
LEXICON INDPRSSG2
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>:%^WEAK%>t K ;
LEXICON INDPRSSG3
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>:%>U1 K ;

LEXICON pronouns
ei:e V-NEG  ;
LEXICON quantifiers
enzimäine:enzimä ORD_KARJALAINE  ;
kaheksatostu:kaheksatostu NUM_  ;
kaksi:kaksi NUM_  ;
kaksitostu:kaksitostu NUM_  ;
kolme:kolm Num-kolme  ;
kolmekymmen:kolmekymmen NUM_  ;
kuuzi:kuuzi NUM_  ;
kuvvei:kuvvei NUM_  ;
nelli:nelli NUM_  ;
nelläskymmen:nelläskymmen NUM_  ;
puolikymmen:puolikymmen NUM_  ;
sadas:sadas NUM_  ;
seičetostu:seičetostu NUM_  ;
seiččiei:seiččiei QNT_  ;
toine:toi ORD_KIELINE  ;
viidestostu:viidestostu NUM_  ;
viizikymmen:viizikymmen NUM_  ;
yheksä:yheksä NUM_  ;
yhekšaš:yhekšaš NUM_  ;
LEXICON verbs
ahneta:ahne V_ALETA  ;
ajuakseh:aja VR_KANDUA  ;
aleta:ale V_ALETA  ;
ambuokseh:ambu VR_AMBUO  ;
anduakseh:anda VR_KANDUA  ;
andua:anda V_KANDUA  ;
astoija:astoi V_SUVAIJA  ;
azettua:azetta V_KANDUA  ;
beseduija:besedui V_SUVAIJA  ;
bluaznavuo:bluaznavu V_VALUO  ;
bövvyttiä:bövvyttiä V_  ;
bövvätä:bövvä V_AVATA  ;
diesvuija:diesvui V_SUVAIJA  ;
eroitella:eroittel V_TULLA  ;
hajuštuo:hajuštu V_VALUO  ;
haldivoija:haldivoi V_SUVAIJA  ;
hapata:happa V_ALETA  ;
hieruo:hiero V_PUNUO  ;
higistyö:higistyö V_  ;
huavata:huava V_AVATA  ;
huaveilla:huaveil V_TULLA  ;
huhtuo:huhto V_PUNUO  ;
huolevuo:huolevu V_VALUO  ;
typätä:typpä V_TYPÄTÄ  ;
hötätä:hötätä V_AVATA  ;
idaroija:idaroi V_SUVAIJA  ;
ielpäi% sanuo:ielpäi% sano V_PUNUO  ;
iloijakseh:iloijakseh V_  ;
imartella:imartella V_TULLA  ;
juuttuo:juuttu V_VALUO  ;
kaivua:kaiva V_KANDUA  ;
kalahtuakseh:kalahtuakseh V_  ;
kandua:kanda V_KANDUA  ;
kaunistella:kaunistel V_TULLA  ;
kaččuo:kaččo V_PUNUO  ;
keiluo:keilu V_VALUO  ;
kezrätä:kezrä V_AVATA  ;
kiduija:kidui V_SUVAIJA  ;
kielitellä:kielittel V_TULLA  ;
kieratakseh:kierda VR_AVATA  ;
kiitiä:kiitiä V_  ;
kodiniekuija:kodiniekui V_SUVAIJA  ;
kuduo:kudo V_PUNUO  ;
kudvua:kudvua V_  ;
kuivata:kuiva V_AVATA  ;
kuivatakseh:kuiva VR_AVATA  ;
kullevuo:kullevu V_VALUO  ;
kuolla:kuol V_TULLA  ;
laskettua:laskettua V_  ;
lauhtuo:lauhtu V_VALUO  ;
laškotella:laškottel V_TULLA  ;
leikkuo:leikko V_PUNUO  ;
levätä:levä V_AVATA  ;
ličatakseh:ličča VR_AVATA  ;
luadie:luadi V_POTKIE  ;
luadie% niistekse:luadie% niistekse V_  ;
lyhendellä:lyhendellä V_TULLA  ;
lʼykätä:lʼykkä V_AVATA  ;
lykätäkseh:lykkä VR_AVATA  ;
lʼöydiä:lʼöydä V_PIDIÄ  ;
manevuo:manevu V_VALUO  ;
matkie:matkie V_  ;
mitatakseh:mitta VR_AVATA  ;
miärätäkseh:miärä VR_AVATA  ;
muokatakseh:muokka VR_AVATA  ;
murendua:murenda V_KANDUA  ;
murginoija:murginoi V_SUVAIJA  ;
murjuo:murjo V_PUNUO  ;
mäčkätä:mäčkätä V_AVATA  ;
naija:naija V_  ;
niitellä:niittel V_TULLA  ;
nojatakseh:noja VR_AVATA  ;
nukkevuo:nukkevu V_VALUO  ;
nytkätä:nytkätä V_AVATA  ;
olla:o V_OLLA  ;
ommella:ommel V_TULLA  ;
pakaštua:pakaštua V_  ;
palgovuo:palgovu V_VALUO  ;
parata:para V_ALETA  ;
pedvatakseh:pedva VR_AVATA  ;
penguo:pengo V_PUNUO  ;
pergua:perga V_KANDUA  ;
pidiä:pidä V_PIDIÄ  ;
pietellä:piettel V_TULLA  ;
pilata:pila V_AVATA  ;
piruija:pirui V_SUVAIJA  ;
potkie:potki V_POTKIE  ;
prozevaija:prozevai V_SUVAIJA  ;
punuo:puno V_PUNUO  ;
punuo:puno V_PUNUO  ;
puolištuo:puolištu V_VALUO  ;
pyhittiä:pyhittiä V_  ;
razvata:razva V_AVATA  ;
resuija:resui V_SUVAIJA  ;
ribuvuo:ribuvu V_VALUO  ;
riibuo:riibo V_PUNUO  ;
riputella:riputtel V_TULLA  ;
ristuo:risto V_PUNUO  ;
riuhatakseh:riuhta VR_AVATA  ;
rodiekseh:rodi VR_RODIEKSEH  ;
ruadua:ruada V_KANDUA  ;
savvustua:savvustua V_  ;
seižuo:seižo V_PUNUO  ;
silmätä:silmätä V_AVATA  ;
suaja:saa V_SUAJA  ;
suata:suva V_SUATA  ;
suolištuo:suolištu V_VALUO  ;
suuvaija:suuvai V_SUVAIJA  ;
syvätäkseh:syvä VR_AVATA  ;
tabailla:tabail V_TULLA  ;
tahtuo:tahto V_PUNUO  ;
temmatakseh:temba VR_AVATA  ;
tiähtätä:tiähtätä V_AVATA  ;
tuata:tage V_ALETA  ;
tulla:tul V_TULLA  ;
tulla% boikožesti:tulla% boikožesti V_  ;
tumakoija:tumakoi V_SUVAIJA  ;
tuskatakseh:tuska VR_AVATA  ;
tutustuo:tutustu V_VALUO  ;
uhkata:uhka V_AVATA  ;
ukatakseh:ukka VR_AVATA  ;
vezoittuo:vezoittu V_VALUO  ;
vilčoittua% (kaččuo% v.):vilčoittua% (kaččuo% v.) V_  ;
voijella:voijel V_TULLA  ;
čakatakseh:čakka VR_AVATA  ;
čilkata:čilka V_AVATA  ;
šeluo:šelo V_PUNUO  ;
žiitoija:žiitoi V_SUVAIJA  ;
